California statutes. Insurance Code
An insurer or plan which contracts for, or authorizes another person to, solicit or contract for alternative rates with providers on its behalf other than in the name of such insurer or plan shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1594, Sec. 12.   Effective September 30, 1982.   Operative January 1, 1983, by Sec. 82 of Ch. 1594.)
-------------------------------------------

10402.1.

An insurer or plan which accepts or ratifies a contract for alternative rates known by it to have been executed by a provider prior to the insurer’s or plan’s authorization, in reliance on the representation that it was authorized by such insurer or plan, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1594, Sec. 13.   Effective September 30, 1982.   Operative January 1, 1983, by Sec. 82 of Ch. 1594.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.1. General Regulation of Health Insurers [10403. - 10403.]

10403.

A health insurer that is subject to the requirements of Chapter 8.5 (commencing with Section 127671) of Part 2 of Division 107 of the Health and Safety Code and that fails to comply with the data submission requirements of that chapter is subject to a civil penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each 30-day period in which the insurer fails to comply. If the failure to comply is willful, the insurer is subject to a civil penalty not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for each 30-day period in which the person fails to comply. The aggregate penalty for each instance of noncompliance shall not exceed one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000). In determining the penalty, the commissioner shall consider the good faith of the insurer and any similar prior violations by the insurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 12, Sec. 35.   (AB 80)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. General Regulation of Life Insurers [10430. - 10509.946.]



  ARTICLE 1. Restrictions on Business [10430. - 10436.]

10430.

An admitted life insurer shall not issue or deliver in this State, any securities or any special or advisory board or other contracts of any kind promising returns and profits as an inducement to insurance nor shall it permit its agents, officers or employees to do so.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

10431.

A life insurer which, as an inducement to insurance, issues or permits its agents, officers, or employees to issue any such securities or contracts in this State or any other State shall not be admitted.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

10432.

A corporation or stock company, acting as agent of a life insurer and its agents, officers, or employees shall not sell, agree or offer to sell, or give or offer to give, directly or indirectly, any such securities or contracts as an inducement to insurance or in connection therewith.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

10433.

Upon proof, after notice and hearing, that any such insurer or agent has violated any of the provisions of sections 10430, 10431, or 10432, the commissioner shall revoke the certificate of authority or license of the insurer or agent so offending.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

10434.

(a) An admitted life insurer shall not pay or contract to pay, directly or indirectly, to any of the parties specified in subdivision (b) any commission or other compensation contingent upon any of the following acts:

(1) The writing or procuring of any policy of life, disability or both classes of insurance issued by the insurer.

(2) Procuring an application therefor by any person.

(3) The payment of any renewal premium or the assumption of
 any life, disability or both of these classes of insurance by the insurer.

(b) It shall not pay this compensation to:

(1) Its president.

(2) Its vice president.

(3) Its secretary.

(4) Its treasurer.

(5) Its actuary.

(6) Its medical director or other physician charged with the duty of examining risks or applications for any of these classes of insurance.

(7) Any member of its board of directors, except when that compensation to be paid to the director would be less than the lesser of 1 percent of
 the insurer’s statutory net gain from operations or 1 percent of commissions on premiums and annuity considerations for the preceding calendar year. This exception shall not apply when more than two of the members of the board of directors of the insurer, when the total number of board members is more than 10, or more than one of the members of the board of directors of the insurer, when the total number of board members is less than 10, would receive that compensation, nor shall this exception apply to any director who has served more than two years as a director. Any director receiving compensation pursuant to this paragraph shall be ineligible to vote on all matters directly relating to that compensation and shall not be counted for purposes of a quorum as to those matters.

(8) Any officer of the insurer other than its agent or solicitor.

(c) Nothing in this article shall
 prevent the payment of compensation to an officer of the insurer based upon the aggregate amounts of insurance issued by the insurer, or issued and in force, during any specified period if the officer is not directly responsible for recommending, underwriting, rating, or otherwise approving the acceptability of insurance risks.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1139, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10435.

Whenever any insurer violates Section 10434, the commissioner may revoke its certificate of authority or refuse to issue a certificate of authority to that insurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 1139, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

10436.

An admitted life insurer may issue a rider to a policy of life insurance for the purpose of providing coverage for long-term care, if the rider has been reviewed and approved, in a manner similar to that of other long-term care insurance products, by the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1015, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1a. Regulation of Internal Affairs of Mutual Insurers [10440. - 10442.]

10440.

In any meeting of members of a domestic mutual insurer writing classes of insurance which include life or disability insurance, the presence in person or by proxy or written vote of 5 percent of the members entitled to vote shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business unless a higher percentage is required by this code or by the by-laws or articles of incorporation of the insurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 425.)
-------------------------------------------

10441.

The provisions of Section 10440 shall not apply to any of the transactions, meetings, or votes described in Sections 1001, 1103, and 1900 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 349.)
-------------------------------------------

10442.

Except as otherwise provided in this article or in the other provisions of this code, the internal affairs of every domestic mutual insurer writing classes of insurance which include life or disability insurance shall be governed by Division 1 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code.

For the purpose of applying the provisions of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code, the provisions thereof referring to shareholders or members shall be applied as though such provisions referred to the policyholders or members of a mutual insurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 425.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Registration of Life Policies [10450. - 10463.]

10450.

Any insurer transacting life insurance in this State on September 30, 1939, may register its policies with the commissioner in the manner and subject to the restrictions set forth in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 933.)
-------------------------------------------

10450.5.

An insurer which is not registering its policies pursuant to the provisions of this article on September 30, 1939, shall not thereafter be permitted to register its policies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 933.)
-------------------------------------------

10450.6.

Any insurer registering its policies pursuant to this article on June 30, 1939, which fails prior to September 1, 1941, to file with the commissioner an election to cease such registration on or before December 31, 1941, shall thereafter continue to register all life policies issued by it. Whenever it fails to continue such registration thereafter, the commissioner shall revoke its certificate of authority, and its condition shall thereupon conclusively be deemed to be such that its further transaction of business will be hazardous to its policyholders, or creditors, or to the public, within the meaning of subdivision (d) of section 1011 of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 933.)
-------------------------------------------

10451.

When an insurer elects to register any of its policies, it shall register every policy thereafter issued by it until it discontinues registration.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

10452.

Such registration shall in each case show the name and age of the insured, number and date of the policy and the kind and amount of insurance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

10454.

An insurer registering policies shall maintain a special deposit of securities with the commissioner for the benefit of such registered policies. Such securities shall be of the character specified in Articles 3, 4 and 6 of Chapter 2, Part 2, Division 1, or specified in sections 10459 and 10460.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

10455.

The commissioner shall give his receipt for the securities and the State shall be responsible for the custody and safe return of any securities so deposited.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

10456.

Such deposit shall be maintained in an amount equal to the full net value of all policies registered up to the time of making the deposit, less the amount loaned on such registered policies.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

10457.

Upon receipt of such securities, the commissioner shall immediately deposit them in the State Treasury in accordance with the provisions of Sections 940 to 946, inclusive, where they shall remain as a special security for the benefit of such registered policies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 676, Sec. 199.)
-------------------------------------------

10458.

Such insurer may at any time withdraw any excess of such securities above the required amount upon satisfying the commissioner by written proof that such excess exists. It may receive the interest on all securities deposited, and exchange such securities by substituting other securities of the required character.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

10459.

If such insurer owns the building in which it has its principal office and the land upon which it stands, or if it owns other real property located in this State and requisite for its accommodation in the convenient transaction of its business, it may, with the permission of the commissioner, mortgage such property to the commissioner for such sum, not exceeding the market value thereof, as he determines.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

10460.

Such mortgage may be deposited in the State treasury as part of the securities required by this article. Such mortgage is withdrawable in like manner with other securities in the deposit. The commissioner shall require the mortgage to be recorded before acceptance for deposit.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

10461.

The commissioner may release any such mortgage or may foreclose it in case such foreclosure becomes necessary.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

10462.

Should any insurer thus registering policies become insolvent, the commissioner may reinsure all or any part of such registered policies, using the securities thus deposited for that purpose.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

10463.

The commissioner shall require in advance, in lawful money of the United States, as a fee for registering each policy as provided by this article, twenty-five cents.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1939, Ch. 933.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Valuation of Life Policies [10478. - 10489.]

10478.

This article is applicable only to policies and contracts issued prior to the operative date as to such policies or contracts of Article 3a, Chapter 1, Part 2, Division 2.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 955.)
-------------------------------------------

10479.

The commissioner shall annually value, or cause to be valued, the reserve liabilities (hereinafter called reserves) for all outstanding life insurance policies and annuity and pure endowment contracts of every admitted life insurer, except that in the case of an alien insurer such valuation shall be limited to its insurance transactions in the United States, and may certify the amount of any such reserves, specifying the mortality table or tables, rate or rates of interest and methods (net level premium method or other) used in the calculation of such reserves. In calculating such reserves, he or she may use group methods and approximate averages for
 fractions of a year or otherwise. In lieu of the valuation of the reserves herein required of any foreign or alien insurer, he or she may accept any valuation made, or caused to be made, by the insurance supervisory official of any state or other jurisdiction when such valuation complies with the minimum standard herein provided and if the official of such state or jurisdiction accepts as sufficient and valid for all legal purposes the certificate of valuation of the commissioner when such certificate states the valuation to have been made in a specified manner according to which the aggregate reserves would be at least as large as if they had been computed in the manner prescribed by the law of that state or jurisdiction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1005, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

10479.5.

When the commissioner has valued the reserve liabilities of an insurer as provided by this article, he or she may upon request of the insurer issue his or her official certificate or certificates describing the reserve liability and the valuation thereof as he or she has determined. For issuing an original certificate, the commissioner shall require, in advance, a fee of forty-seven dollars ($47), plus the actual cost to the department of making the valuation on which the certificate is based including, but not limited to, the aggregate salaries computed on an hourly basis for the time actually spent thereon by all of the department personnel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 534, Sec. 60.   (AB 1699)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

10480.

On or before the first day of March of each year every domestic incorporated life insurer shall furnish the commissioner the necessary data for determining the valuation of all its policies outstanding on the last preceding thirty-first of December.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1005, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

10481.

Every admitted foreign life insurer shall, upon the written demand of the commissioner, furnish him or her, at such time as he designates, the requisite data for determining the valuation of all its policies then outstanding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1005, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

10482.

Except as provided in Sections 10484 and 10485, and except as provided in Section 10489.7 for benefits purchased under group annuity and pure endowment contracts subject to this article, valuations of life policies must be based on the standards set forth in Section 986.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

10483.

When the laws of any other State require a valuation of the outstanding policies of a domestic life insurer by any standard of valuation different from that named in this article, the commissioner may make such valuation for use in such other State, and issue his certificate in accordance therewith.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

10484.

In the case of insurance issued by a domestic insurer authorized to do business in a foreign country upon the lives of residents of that country, the commissioner may vary the mortality standard to a standard applicable to that country.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

10485.

Any life insurer issuing policies of group life insurance may value such policies on any accepted table of mortality with interest assumption adopted by the insurer for that purpose if such standard is not lower than the American Men Ultimate Table of Mortality with interest assumption at three and one-half per cent per annum.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

10486.

All policies of group insurance shall be segregated by the insurer into a separate class and the mortality experience kept separate. The number of policies, amount of insurance, reserves, premiums and payments to policyholders thereunder, together with the mortality table and interest assumption adopted by the insurer, shall be reported separately in its annual financial statement.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1935, Ch. 145.)
-------------------------------------------

10486.9.

(a) As prescribed in subdivision (b), an insurer may maintain reserves on a one year preliminary term basis on a life, term or endowment policy if by its terms such policy expressly provides that the first year’s insurance under such policy is term insurance purchased by part or the whole of the premium to be received during the first year.

(b) If the actuarial net preliminary term renewal premium in the case of(1) insurance under a limited-payment life preliminary term policy
 providing for the payment of all premiums thereon within less than 20 years from the date thereof; or(2) endowment insurance under an endowment preliminary term policy,
exceeds the actuarial net preliminary term renewal premium, calculated on the same table of mortality and rate of interest, for a 20-payment life policy, the reserve on such policy specified under (1) or (2) of this subdivision (b), as the case may be, at the end of any year, including the first, shall not be less than the sum of the reserve on a 20-payment life preliminary term policy issued at the same time on a life of the same age, and the actuarial net level premium reserve for a pure endowment maturing at the end of the premium payment period, equal to the excess of the full net level premium reserve, at the end of such premium payment period, on such policy
 specified under (1) or (2) of this subdivision (b), as the case may be, over the reserve, at the end of such premium payment period, of such 20-payment life preliminary term policy.

The premium payment period herein referred to is 20 years or the period, if less, during which premiums are actually payable under such policy specified in (1) or (2) of this subdivision (b), as the case may be.

(c) As used in this section, the term “20-payment life preliminary term policy” means a life insurance policy embodying all of the following attributes:

(1) It is whole-life insurance;

(2) The premium charged is payable annually or at lesser intervals until 20 annual premiums or a proportionately greater number of premiums payable at intervals less than one year shall have been paid, or
 until the prior death of the insured;

(3) The first year’s insurance is term insurance purchased by the whole or part of the premium to be received during the first contract year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 277.)
-------------------------------------------

10488.

Reserves for all policies and contracts to which this article applies may be calculated, at the option of the insurer, according to any standards which produce greater aggregate reserves for all such policies and contracts than the minimum reserves required by this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 955.)
-------------------------------------------

10489.

Any insurer which at any time shall have adopted any standard of valuation producing greater aggregate reserves than those calculated according to the minimum standard provided in this article or Article 3a of this chapter may, with the approval of the commissioner, adopt any lower standard of valuation, but not lower than the minimum therein provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 955.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3a. Standard Valuation Law [10489.1. - 10489.992.]

10489.1.

(a) This article shall be known as the Standard Valuation Law.

(b) For the purposes of this article, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Accident and health insurance” means contracts that incorporate morbidity risk and provide protection against economic loss resulting from accident, sickness, or medical conditions and as may be specified in the valuation manual. 

(2) “Company” means an entity that (A) has written, issued, or reinsured life insurance contracts, accident and health insurance contracts, or deposit-type contracts in this state and has at least one policy in force or on claim or (B) has written, issued, or reinsured life insurance contracts, accident and health insurance contracts, or deposit-type contracts in any state and is required to hold a certificate of authority to write life insurance, accident and health insurance, or deposit-type contracts in this state.

(3) “Deposit-type contract” means contracts that do not incorporate mortality or morbidity risks and as may be specified in the valuation manual.

(4) “Life insurance” means contracts that incorporate mortality risk, including annuity and pure endowment contracts, and as may be specified in the valuation manual.

(5) “NAIC” means the National Association of Insurance Commissioners. 

(6) “Principle-based valuation” means a reserve valuation that uses one or more methods or one or more assumptions determined by the insurer and is required to comply with Section 10489.97, as specified in the valuation manual. 

(7) “Valuation manual” means the manual of valuation instructions adopted by the NAIC as specified in this article or as subsequently amended.

(c) For the purposes of this article, the following definitions shall apply on and after the operative date of the valuation manual:

(1) “Appointed actuary” means a qualified actuary who is appointed in accordance with the valuation manual to prepare the actuarial opinion required in subdivision (b) of Section 10489.15.

(2) “Policyholder behavior” means any action a policyholder, contractholder, or any other person with the right to elect options, such as a certificate holder, may take under a policy or contract subject to this article, including, but not limited to, lapse, withdrawal, transfer,
 deposit, premium payment, loan, annuitization, or benefit elections prescribed by the policy or contract, but excluding events of mortality or morbidity that result in benefits prescribed in their essential aspects by the terms of the policy or contract.

(3) “Qualified actuary” means an individual who is qualified to sign the applicable statement of actuarial opinion in accordance with the American Academy of Actuaries qualification standards for actuaries signing those statements and who meets the requirements specified in the valuation manual.

(4) “Tail risk” means a risk that occurs either when the frequency of low probability events is higher than expected under a normal probability distribution or when there are observed events of very significant size or magnitude. 

(d) This article and Sections 10480, 10481,
 10483, 10484, and 10486 shall apply (1) to the valuation of policies and contracts subject to this article issued on or after the operative date of the valuation manual and (2) as provided in Section 10489.3 as to the valuation of benefits purchased under group annuity and pure endowment contracts issued prior to that operative date.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 658, Sec. 4.   (SB 696)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10489.12.

(a) For policies and contracts issued prior to the operative date of the valuation manual, both of the following shall be satisfied:

(1) The commissioner shall annually value, or cause to be valued, the reserve liabilities (hereinafter called reserves) for all outstanding life insurance policies and annuity and pure endowment contracts of every life insurance company doing business in this state issued prior to the operative date of the valuation manual. In calculating reserves, the commissioner may use group methods and approximate averages for fractions of a year or otherwise. In lieu of the valuation of the reserves required of a foreign or alien company, the commissioner may accept a valuation
 made, or caused to be made, by the insurance supervisory official of any state or other jurisdiction when the valuation complies with the minimum standard provided in this article.

(2) Sections 10489.2, 10489.3, 10489.4, 10489.5, 10489.6, 10489.7, 10489.8, 10489.9, 10489.93, and 10489.95 shall apply to all appropriate policies and contracts subject to this article and issued prior to the operative date of the valuation manual. Sections 10489.96 and 10489.97 shall not apply to any of those policies and contracts.

(b) For policies and contracts issued on or after the operative date of the valuation manual, both of the following shall be satisfied:

(1) The commissioner shall annually value, or cause to be valued, the reserves for all outstanding life insurance contracts, annuity and pure endowment contracts, accident
 and health contracts, and deposit-type contracts of every company issued on or after the operative date of the valuation manual. In lieu of the valuation of the reserves required of a foreign or alien company, the commissioner may accept a valuation made, or caused to be made, by the insurance supervisory official of any state or other jurisdiction when the valuation complies with the minimum standard provided in this article.

(2) Sections 10489.96 and 10489.97 shall apply to all policies and contracts issued on or after the operative date of the valuation manual.

(History: Added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 658, Sec. 5.   (SB 696)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

10489.15.

(a) Each of the following shall apply to actuarial opinions submitted prior to the operative date of the valuation manual:

(1) For an actuarial opinion, every life insurance company doing business in this state shall annually submit the opinion of a qualified actuary as to whether the reserves and related actuarial items held in support of the policies and contracts specified by the commissioner by regulation are computed appropriately, are based on assumptions that satisfy contractual provisions, are consistent with prior reported amounts, and comply with applicable laws of this state. The commissioner shall define by regulation the specifics of this opinion and add any other
 items deemed to be necessary to its scope.

(2) (A) For an actuarial analysis of reserves and assets supporting reserves, every life insurance company, except as exempted by regulation, shall also annually include in the opinion required by paragraph (1), an opinion of the same qualified actuary as to whether the reserves and related actuarial items held in support of the policies and contracts specified by the commissioner by regulation, when considered in light of the assets held by the company with respect to the reserves and related actuarial items, including, but not limited to, the investment earnings on the assets and the considerations anticipated to be received and retained under the policies and contracts, make adequate provision for the company’s obligations under the policies and contracts, including, but
 not limited to, the benefits under and expenses associated with the policies and contracts.

(B) The commissioner may provide by regulation for a transition period for establishing any higher reserves that the qualified actuary may deem necessary in order to render the opinion required by this section.

(3) An opinion required by paragraphs (1) and (2) shall be governed by the following:

(A) A memorandum, in form and substance acceptable to the commissioner as specified by regulation, shall be prepared to support each actuarial opinion.

(B) If the insurance company fails to provide a supporting memorandum at the request of the commissioner within a period specified
 by regulation, or the commissioner determines that the supporting memorandum provided by the insurance company fails to meet the standards prescribed by the regulations or is otherwise unacceptable to the commissioner, the commissioner may engage a qualified actuary at the expense of the company to review the opinion and the basis for the opinion and prepare the supporting memorandum required by the commissioner.

(4) Every opinion required by this subdivision shall be governed by the following provisions:

(A) The opinion shall be submitted with the annual statement reflecting the valuation of the reserve liabilities for each year ending on or after December 31, 1992.

(B) The opinion shall apply to all business in force,
 including individual and group health insurance plans, in form and substance acceptable to the commissioner as specified by regulation.

(C) The opinion shall be based on standards adopted from time to time by the Actuarial Standards Board and on any additional
 standards as the commissioner may by regulation prescribe.

(D) In the case of an opinion required to be submitted by a foreign or alien company, the commissioner may accept the opinion filed by that company with the insurance supervisory official of another state if the commissioner determines that the opinion reasonably meets the requirements applicable to a company domiciled in this state.

(E) For the purposes of this paragraph, “qualified actuary” means a member in good standing of the American Academy of Actuaries who meets the requirements set forth in the regulation.

(F) The qualified actuary shall be liable for the actuary’s negligence or other tortious conduct.

(G) Disciplinary action by the commissioner against the company or the qualified actuary may be defined in regulations by the commissioner.

(H) Except as provided in subparagraphs (L), (M), and (N), documents, materials, or other information in the possession or control of the Department of Insurance that are a memorandum in support of the opinion, and any other material provided by the company to the commissioner in connection with the memorandum, shall be confidential by law and privileged, shall not be subject to disclosure pursuant to the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code), and shall not be subject to subpoena or discovery or admissible in evidence in any private civil action. However, the
 commissioner is authorized to use those documents, materials, or other information in the furtherance of any regulatory or legal action brought as a part of the commissioner’s official duties.

(I) The commissioner, any person who received documents, materials, or other information while acting under the authority of the commissioner, or any person with whom those documents, materials, or other information are shared pursuant to clause (i) of subparagraph (J), shall not be permitted or required to testify in any private civil action concerning those confidential documents, materials, or information subject to subparagraph (H).

(J) In order to assist in the performance of the commissioner’s duties, the commissioner:

(i) May share documents, materials, or other information, including the confidential and privileged documents, materials, or information subject to subparagraph (H), with other state, federal, and international regulatory agencies, with the NAIC and its affiliates and subsidiaries, and with state, federal, and international law enforcement authorities, provided that the recipient agrees to maintain the confidentiality and privileged status of the document, material, or other information.

(ii) May receive documents, materials, or information, including otherwise confidential and privileged documents, materials, or information, from the NAIC and its affiliates and subsidiaries, and from regulatory and law enforcement officials of other foreign or domestic jurisdictions, and shall maintain as confidential or privileged any
 document, material, or information received with notice or the understanding that it is confidential or privileged under the laws of the jurisdiction that is the source of the document, material, or information.

(iii) Enter into agreements governing sharing and use of information consistent with subparagraphs (H) to (J), inclusive.

(K) No waiver of any applicable privilege or claim of confidentiality in the documents, materials, or information shall occur as a result of disclosure of the documents, materials, or information to the commissioner under this section or as a result of sharing as authorized in subparagraph (J).

(L) A memorandum in support of the opinion, and any other material provided by the company to the
 commissioner in connection with the memorandum, may be subject to subpoena for the purpose of defending an action seeking damages from the actuary submitting the memorandum by reason of an action required by this section or by regulations promulgated pursuant to this section.

(M) The memorandum or the other material may otherwise be released by the commissioner with the written consent of the company or to the American Academy of Actuaries upon request stating that the memorandum or other material is required for the purpose of professional disciplinary proceedings and setting forth procedures satisfactory to the commissioner for preserving the confidentiality of the memorandum or the other material.

(N) Once any portion of the confidential memorandum is cited by the
 company in its marketing efforts or is cited before a governmental agency other than a state insurance department or is released by the company to the news media, all portions of the confidential memorandum shall no longer be confidential.

(b) Each of the following shall apply to actuarial opinions submitted after the operative date of the valuation manual:

(1) For an actuarial opinion, every company with outstanding life insurance contracts, accident and health insurance contracts, or deposit-type contracts in this state and subject to regulation by the commissioner shall annually submit the opinion of the appointed actuary as to whether the reserves and related actuarial items held in support of the policies and contracts are computed appropriately, are based on assumptions that
 satisfy contractual provisions, are consistent with prior reported amounts, and comply with applicable laws of this state. The valuation manual shall prescribe the specifics of this opinion, including any items deemed to be necessary to its scope.

(2) For an actuarial analysis of reserves and assets supporting reserves, every company with outstanding life insurance contracts, accident and health insurance contracts, or deposit-type contracts in this state and subject to regulation by the commissioner, except as exempted in the valuation manual, shall also annually include in the opinion required by paragraph (1) an opinion of the same appointed actuary as to whether the reserves and related actuarial items held in support of the policies and contracts specified in the valuation manual, when considered in light of the assets held by the
 company with respect to the reserves and related actuarial items, including, but not limited to, the investment earnings on the assets and the considerations anticipated to be received and retained under the policies and contracts, adequately provide for the company’s obligations under the policies and contracts, including, but not limited to, the benefits under and expenses associated with the policies and contracts.

(3) Every opinion required by this subdivision shall be governed by both of the following provisions:

(A) A memorandum, in form and substance as specified in the valuation manual, and acceptable to the commissioner, shall be prepared to support each actuarial opinion.

(B) If the insurance company fails to
 provide a supporting memorandum at the request of the commissioner within a period specified in the valuation manual, or the commissioner determines that the supporting memorandum provided by the insurance company fails to meet the standards prescribed by the valuation manual or is otherwise unacceptable to the commissioner, the commissioner may engage a qualified actuary at the expense of the company to review the opinion and the basis for the opinion and prepare the supporting memorandum required by the commissioner.

(4) Every opinion subject to this subdivision shall be governed by the following provisions:

(A) The opinion shall be in form and substance as specified in the valuation manual and acceptable to the commissioner.

(B) The opinion shall be submitted with the annual statement reflecting the valuation of the reserve liabilities for each year ending on or after the operative date of the valuation manual.

(C) The opinion shall apply to all policies and contracts subject to paragraph (2), plus other actuarial liabilities as may be specified in the valuation manual.

(D) The opinion shall be based on standards adopted from time to time by the Actuarial Standards Board or its successor, and on such additional standards as may be prescribed in the valuation manual.

(E) If an opinion is required to be submitted by a foreign or alien company, the commissioner may accept the opinion filed by that company with the insurance supervisory
 official of another state if the commissioner determines that the opinion reasonably meets the requirements applicable to a company domiciled in this state.

(F) The qualified actuary shall be liable for the actuary’s negligence or other tortious conduct.

(G) Disciplinary action by the commissioner against the company or the appointed actuary may be defined in regulations by the commissioner.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the right of access to, or prohibit the admissibility as evidence in a private civil action of, any information, documents, data, or other materials not held for the purposes of this article by the commissioner or a person acting under the authority of the commissioner,